Maine, session 132, LD1153.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §747, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 195, §2, is amended
to read:
2. Board of trustees established. The Board of Trustees of the Cross Insurance Arena
is established to develop, review and make recommendations to the county commissioners
on financial, contractual and policy issues regarding the Cross Insurance Arena. The board
of trustees consists of 9 7 members appointed by the county commissioners as follows:
A. Two members from the City of Portland;
B. One member from each of the following sets of municipalities county commissioner
districts in Cumberland County:
(1) South Portland and Cape Elizabeth County Commissioner District 1;
(2) Scarborough, Westbrook and Falmouth County Commissioner District 2;
(3) Gorham, Windham, Standish, Baldwin and Sebago County Commissioner
District 3;
(4) Brunswick, Freeport, Harpswell, Pownal and New Gloucester County
Commissioner District 4; and
(5) Yarmouth, Cumberland, North Yarmouth, Gray, Casco, Raymond, Naples,
Harrison and Bridgton County Commissioner District 5; and
C. Two members at large.
Trustees are appointed for a term of 3 years and may not serve more than 2 consecutive
terms.
Page 1 - 132LR1739(02)